Wisconsin, session 2025, SB95.
do enact as follows:SB95,11Section 1. 304.078 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:SB95,2,92304.078 (3) If a person is disqualified from voting under s. 6.03 (1) (b), his or 3her right to vote is restored when he or she completes the term of imprisonment or 4probation for the crime that led to the disqualification and has paid all fines, costs, 5fees, surcharges, and restitution, and has completed any court-ordered community 6service, imposed in connection with the crime. The department or, if the person is 7sentenced to a county jail or house of correction, the jailer the elections commission 8shall inform the person in writing at the time his or her right to vote is restored 9under this subsection.SB95,210Section 2. 973.20 (10) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB95,3,511973.20 (10) (a) The If the defendant violated s. 940.302 (2) or 948.051, the 12court shall require that restitution be paid immediately and, if the defendant fails, 13the court shall issue an execution against the property of the defendant in the same 14mode as upon a judgment entered in the circuit court in civil actions. In other 15cases, the court may require that restitution be paid immediately, within a specified 1period, or in specified installments. If the defendant is placed on probation or 2sentenced to imprisonment, the end of a specified period shall not be later than the 3end of any period of probation, extended supervision, or parole. If the defendant is 4sentenced to the intensive sanctions program, the end of a specified period shall not 5be later than the end of the sentence under s. 973.032 (3) (a).SB95,3,66